Tennessee, session 114, HB1402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5203(a), is amended by deleting
the language "for the fiscal year in progress, for the latest completed calendar year, and for
calendar year 1977." and substituting instead the language "for the fiscal year in progress and
for the latest completed calendar year.".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5203(b), is amended by deleting
the language "for the ensuing fiscal year, such actual appropriations for the fiscal year in
progress, and the 1977-1978 fiscal year appropriations from state tax revenues." and
substituting instead the language "for the ensuing fiscal year and such actual appropriations for
the fiscal year in progress.".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1402
001590
- 1 -